Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-1636
Fund; plan for disbursement.

The Governor or the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment as representative of the Governor shall develop a plan for the disbursement of the money credited to the fund for submission to the United States Department of Energy. The plan shall be in accordance with the specifications and guidelines of the applicable federal court order and any applicable federal law or regulations.

Laws 1987, LB 683, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 764, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 168;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 457.